Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Water  Resources Department, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Administrative services ............  $ 5,662,899
(2) Field services ............................  $ 11,753,018
(3) Water rights and
adjudications............................. $ 3,973,306
(4) Technical services ..................... $ 10,766,717
(5) Director’s office ........................ $ 5,002,567
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$8,493,320 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Water Resources Department for debt service.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding federal funds  received under cooperative agreements with or contracts from the
Bureau of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior, the United States
Army Corps of Engineers, the  United States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Ad-
ministration and the National Fish and  Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in this section, collected or received  by the Water Resources
Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative services ............ $ 43,281,310
(2) Field services ............................ $  3,084,324
(3) Water rights and
adjudications............................. $ 4,854,962
(4) Technical services ..................... $ 4,139,951
(5) Director’s office ........................ $ 55,247
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
Enrolled House Bill 5043 (HB 5043-A) Page 1
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 3 of this 2019 Act, col-
lected or received by the Water Resources Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative services ............ $ 25,000
(2) Field services ............................ $ 207,663
(3) Water rights and
adjudications............................. $ 25,000
(4) Technical services ..................... $ 594,071
(5) Director’s office ........................ $ 25,000
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House June 12, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5043 (HB 5043-A) Page 2